Hawaii statutes.
§185-9 Obstructing the administrator or
managers; penalty. Any person who obstructs or interferes with or prevents
the administrator or any manager or any person in the performance of any duty
authorized by this chapter shall be fined not less than $500 nor more than
$2,000. [L 1953, c 100, §12; RL 1955, §19-60; HRS §185-10; ren and am L 1974, c
64, pt of §1; am L 1994, c 140, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next